Alabama, session 2026rs, SB295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-51-84, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-51-84
(a) The per annum compensation shall be eighty-eight
thousand dollars ($88,000) for the judge of probate effective
October 1, 1996.
(b) The compensation amount in subsection (a) shall be
paid out of the general fund of the Montgomery County
Commission in the same manner as other county employees are
paid.
(c) Subsequent to October 1, 1996, the compensation
amount in subsection (a) shall be increased by the same
percentage as the across-the-board percentage increase
received by full-time county employees at the same time as the
increase is received by the county employees, except that the
amount shall not be increased by more than three thousand
dollars ($3,000) in any fiscal year.
(d) Beginning October 1, 2026, the individual serving
as judge of probate on June 1, 2025, in lieu of any other
salary, shall receive an annual salary of one hundred
fifty-three thousand seven hundred twenty-five dollars
($153,725) per year."
Page 1

($153,725) per year."
SB295 Enrolled
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
SB295 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB295
Senate 24-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 17-Mar-26




By: Senator Barfoot
Page 3